Arkansas, session 2025, SB550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-5-204(a)(1), concerning the powers and
duties of the Department of Agriculture to administer the Livestock and
Poultry Special Revenue Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Administer this subchapter and the Livestock and Poultry
Animal Health Special Revenue Fund;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 2-5-206(b), concerning fees collected under
the Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) All fees collected under this subchapter shall be deposited into
the Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Special Revenue Fund to be used by
the department to administer this subchapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 2-6-106(e), concerning the collection of
civil penalties under the Arkansas Catfish Processor Fair Practices Act of
*CRH130*
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
1987, is amended to read as follows:
(e) Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited
into the Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Special Revenue Fund.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 2-10-104 is amended to read as follows:
2-10-104. Powers and duties of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health — Definitions.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall:
(A) Have jurisdiction over milk and milk products marketed
in the State of Arkansas, including without limitation the base milk price
paid to an Arkansas milk producer; and
(B)(i) Require that an Arkansas milk producer receive
Class 1 prices for milk utilized or sold as fluid milk in this state.
(ii) Subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section applies
only to milk that is both produced in and sold as fluid milk within this
state.
(2) The commission board may:
(A) Revise the payment of Class 1 prices required under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section if Arkansas is no longer considered
a milk-deficit state; and
(B) Make, modify, and enforce rules that the commission
board deems necessary to effectively carry out this subsection.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Base milk price” means the top line of a milk producer's
milk check before deductions for quality premiums or discounts,
transportation costs, and cooperative administrative fees;
(2) “Class 1 price” means the price declared by the Federal Milk
Marketing Order No. 7; and
(3) “Fluid milk” means milk used for buttermilk, eggnog,
flavored, low-fat, skimmed, or whole milk.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 2-32-301 is repealed.
2-32-301. Equine monitoring by identification chips.
(a)(1) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:
(A) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission has been
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
authorized by the United States Department of Agriculture to develop and
administer a voluntary equine identification system; and
(B) Embedding a chip for the purpose of identifying an
animal can endanger the animal if not properly injected and placed.
(2) Therefore, it is the purpose of this section to establish
criteria for persons engaged in the voluntary embedding of chips for equine
identification.
(b) The commission shall promulgate rules setting forth training
requirements for the voluntary embedding or injecting a chip for purpose of
animal identification.
(c) The commission shall administer training and provide certification
upon satisfactory completion.
(d) The commission shall establish a fine for failure to obtain proper
certification before embedding or injecting a chip for the purpose of equine
animal identification.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code §§ 2-32-501 through 2-32-505 are amended to
read as follows:
2-32-501. Administrative penalties.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health may impose administrative penalties not to exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per violation against a person who violates any provision of
this subtitle or any rule adopted by the commission board under this
subtitle.
(b) The imposition of administrative penalties shall be conducted
under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(c) The commission board or the commission's board's designee may
issue subpoenas.
(d) If a person against whom an administrative penalty has been
imposed by the commission board as authorized under this section fails to pay
the penalty to the commission board, the commission board may file an action
to collect the administrative penalty in the circuit court of the county in
which the person resides.

2-32-502. Subpoenas — Refusal to testify.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
Health or a member of the commission board may issue a subpoena for a witness
to require his or her attendance and testimony before the commission board,
and to require the production of books, papers, and records in any proceeding
before the commission board that may be material to questions before the
commission board.
(b) The subpoena under subsection (a) of this section shall be served
by:
(1) The county sheriff of the county in which the person
resides;
(2) The deputy of the county sheriff; or
(3) Any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this
state.
(c) If a person fails or refuses to comply with a subpoena issued by
the commission board or a member of the commission board, or refuses to
testify or answer to a matter in which he or she may lawfully be
interrogated, the circuit court of the county in which the person is
domiciled, on application of the commission board may:
(1) In term time or vacation, issue an attachment for the
person;
(2) Compel the person to:
(A) Comply with the subpoena;
(B) Appear before the commission board;
(C) Produce the relevant documents; and
(D) Give his or her testimony upon matters as may be
lawfully required; and
(3) Punish for contempt a person who fails to obey an order
under this section, if the person disobeys a subpoena.
(d) If a person is not domiciled in this state, the circuit court of
the county in which the hearing is held or is to be held shall have
jurisdiction.

2-32-503. Administration of oath to witnesses.
A member of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health or his or her attorney may administer an oath to any witness in
any hearing, investigation, or proceeding under this subtitle.

03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
2-32-504. Appellate review.
A person affected by a rule, action, or order made by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health may obtain review of
the rule, action, or order under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq.

2-32-505. Disposition of fees and penalties.
(a) Fees paid and penalties collected under this subtitle shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues credited to the
Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health Disease and Pest Control Fund.
(b) Fees or penalties collected under this subtitle shall be cash
funds when received by the Treasurer of State and shall not be deposited into
or deemed a part of the State Treasury for the purpose of:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29;
(2) Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12;
(3) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20; or
(4) Any other constitutional or statutory provision.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code §§ 2-33-101 through 2-33-105 are amended to
read as follows:
2-33-101. Creation of commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health.
There is created within the Department of Agriculture the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health.

2-33-102. Members.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall consist of nine (9) members who are residents and electors of
this state to be appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent
of the Senate for terms of five (5) years.
(2) At least two (2) No more than three (3) members of the
commission board shall be veterinarians, at least one (1) of whom shall be
engaged primarily in large animal or food supply veterinary medicine
consisting of one (1) veterinarian from each of the following practice areas:
(A) Poultry;
(B) Large animal; and
(C) General practice.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(3) The remaining members shall be actively engaged in the
Arkansas livestock, dairy, or poultry industries.
(b) Each congressional district shall be represented by membership on
the commission board.
(c) The term of office shall commence on January 15 following the
expiration date of the preceding term and shall end on January 14 of the
fifth year following the year in which the term commenced.
(d) Any vacancies arising in the membership of the commission board
for any reason other than expiration of the terms for which the members were
appointed shall be filled by appointment by the Governor and be effective
until the expiration of the terms, subject to the confirmation of the Senate.
(e) Before entering upon his or her duties, each member of the
commission board shall take, subscribe, and file in the office of the
Secretary of State an oath to support the United States Constitution and the
Arkansas Constitution and to faithfully perform the duties of the office upon
which he or she is about to enter.
(f)(1) Members of the commission board shall receive no pay for their
services.
(2) Members of the commission board may receive expense
reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(g)(1) The commission board shall create a committee to make
recommendations to the commission board, including without limitation
recommendations regarding:
(A) Rulemaking;
(B) Disciplinary issues;
(C) Ethical complaints; and
(D) Evaluation of applications under the Arkansas
Veterinary Medical Practice Act, § 17-101-101 et seq.
(2) The veterinary members of the commission board under
subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be members of the committee.
(3) The Chair of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health shall also designate an additional two (2) Arkansas
licensed veterinarians who are engaged primarily in small animal veterinary
medicine to serve on the committee.

2-33-103. Organization and meetings.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall from time to time select from its membership a chair Chair of
the Board of Animal Health and a vice chair.
(b)(1) The commission board shall adopt and may modify rules for the
conduct of its business and shall keep a record of its transactions,
findings, and determinations, which shall be public.
(2) Meetings of the commission board shall be called by the
Chair of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission chair or by four (4)
members of the commission board.
(c)(1) A majority of the membership of the commission board shall
constitute a quorum.
(2) A majority vote of those members present shall be required
for any action of the commission board.
(d) The Governor may remove a member of the commission board before
the expiration of his or her term for cause only, after notice and a hearing
in accordance with §§ 25-17-210 and 25-17-211.
(e) All meetings shall be open to the public.

2-33-104. Director.
(a)(1) The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve at
the pleasure of the Governor.
(2) The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department
of Agriculture.
(b)(1) The secretary may delegate to the director any of the powers or
duties required to administer the:
(A) Statutory duties of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health; and
(B) Rules, orders, or directives promulgated or issued by
the commission board.
(2) The director may exercise the powers and duties delegated to
him or her under subdivision (b)(1) of this section in the name of the
commission board and of the Department of Agriculture.

2-33-105. State Veterinarian.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall employ a
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
State Veterinarian.
(b) The State Veterinarian shall be a person who has been granted the
degree of Doctor of Veterinary Medicine and holds a current license issued by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 2-33-107 is amended to read as follows:
2-33-107. Powers and duties generally.
(a) Authority for the control, suppression, and eradication of
livestock and poultry diseases and pests, and supervision of livestock and
poultry work in this state, including authority to promulgate rules governing
the handling, sale, and use of vaccines, antigens, and other biological
products used for reportable diseases and emergencies affecting livestock and
poultry, is vested in the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health.
(b) The commission Department of Agriculture shall have the authority
to:
(1) Enter into cooperative work agreements with any or all
federal agencies in matters relating to the functions performable by the
commission department including, but not limited to, general livestock and
poultry disease control programs;
(2) Receive and expend any moneys arising from federal means,
grants, contributions, gratuities, or reimbursements for or on account of any
of the functions at any time performable by the commission department;
(3) Cooperate with similar agencies existing in other states and
with the appropriate federal agencies and appropriate other agencies of this
state for the purpose of coordinating laws and rules governing the interstate
movement of livestock and poultry and the products producible therefrom, with
the view of safeguarding against animal diseases, insects, and pests and at
the same time endeavoring to eliminate interstate trade barriers;
(4) Cooperate with, and receive the cooperation of, all state-
supported institutions of higher education in matters of mutual interest
relating to the development of the livestock and poultry interests of this
state;
(5) Cooperate with the state, district, and county livestock
show associations in the promotion and development of the livestock and
poultry industry of this state;
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(6) Contract and be contracted with;
(7) Take other action, not inconsistent with law, as it shall
deem necessary or desirable to effectively carry out its duties;
(8) Make modifications or adjustments in disease and pest
control and eradication activities and programs as it deems necessary or
appropriate to enable it to carry out its responsibilities with respect to
such activities and programs;
(9) Obtain, upon majority vote of the commission board, health
records of livestock and poultry, including records of livestock and poultry
produced, sold, processed, or otherwise handled, to enable it to effectively
administer and enforce its rules and laws relating to disease or pest control
and eradication programs; and
(10) Prescribe, by administrative rule, the method and manner
for testing and vaccination of livestock or poultry located within the state
but such authority shall not interfere with farmer vaccination of his or her
own product.
(c) The commission board shall have the authority to make, modify, and
enforce such rules and orders, not inconsistent with law, as it shall from
time to time deem necessary to effectively carry out the functions
performable by it.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 2-33-111(a) and (b), concerning the
promulgation of rules and fees collected by the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission related to livestock and poultry diagnostic services, are
amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health may promulgate rules concerning services performed by the Arkansas
Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory.
(b)(1) A fee structure may be designed and maintained by the
commission Department of Agriculture for the purpose of defraying the cost of
diagnostic services.
(2)(A) The fees collected shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as special revenues and shall be credited to the Livestock and
Poultry Animal Health Special Revenue Fund.
(B) Before the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount of moneys which will remain
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
at the end of the fiscal year into the account from fees collected under this
section and shall allow the moneys to be carried forward and made available
for the same purposes in the next succeeding fiscal year.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 2-33-113 and 2-33-114 are amended to read
as follows:
2-33-113. Disposition of fees and revenues.
All fees and revenues collected by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Department of Agriculture shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as special revenues to be credited to the Livestock and Poultry
Commission Animal Health Disease and Pest Control Fund.

2-33-114. Federal Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal
Health Fund.
(a) There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the
“Federal Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health Fund”.
(b) Federal funds as may be allotted to the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture for maintenance and operation of
its cooperative programs with the United States Department of Agriculture
shall be deposited into the fund created in this section.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 2-33-301 is repealed.
2-33-301. Division of Markets and Grading.
There is established a Division of Markets and Grading of the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission which shall have the responsibility of
administering, under the direction of the commission, the provisions of the
Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969, § 20-58-201 et seq., as amended, and the
Poultry and Egg Grading Program authorized by this subchapter.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code §§ 2-33-303 through 2-33-308 are amended to
read as follows:
2-33-303. Poultry and egg grading program Egg Grading Program.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture
is authorized to establish a Poultry and Egg Grading Program in this state
which shall be established in cooperation with the United States Department
of Agriculture and shall be in compliance with the applicable standards and
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
requirements as prescribed by the United States Department of Agriculture for
federal poultry and egg grading purposes.

2-33-304. Providing of poultry and egg grading services.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations for poultry and
egg grading in this state as may be necessary for the establishment and
enforcement thereof.
(2) The rules and regulations shall be in compliance with the
standards and requirements established by the United States Department of
Agriculture for poultry and egg grading purposes.
(b) The commission board may establish a formula or method of
prorating the cost of providing the poultry grading services among the
various processors or processing plants using the services.
(c)(1) Poultry and egg grading services shall be provided for only
those processors or processing plants who make application, who shall comply
with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission board, and who
shall pay the cost of the services in accordance with regulations rules of
the commission board.
(2)(A) Any poultry or egg processor or egg processing plant
failing to pay the cost of the services in accordance with the regulations
rules promulgated by the commission board shall forfeit the right to have
poultry graded until the costs are paid.
(B) All unpaid costs shall be collectible by the
commission Department of Agriculture in the same manner provided by law for
collection of delinquent gross receipts taxes.

2-33-305. Intergovernmental cooperation.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Secretary of the
Department of Agriculture is authorized to cooperate with the appropriate
federal agencies and the appropriate agencies of this state and other states
for the purpose of coordinating laws and rules governing the interstate
movement of eggs and graded poultry with a view of safeguarding the public
health and quality of these products and at the same time endeavoring to
eliminate interstate trade barriers.

03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
2-33-306. Agreement with federal department.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture
is authorized to enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States
Department of Agriculture whereby the commission Department of Agriculture
will bill poultry and egg processors in Arkansas for poultry and egg grading
and egg products inspection services performed by state and federal personnel
and will collect charges for these services and remit a portion thereof to
the United States Department of Agriculture for the services performed by
personnel of the United States Department of Agriculture in accordance with
the provisions of §§ 2-33-301 2-33-303 — 2-33-305, 2-33-307, and laws
amendatory thereto.

2-33-307. Poultry and Egg Grading Fund.
(a) All funds received by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Department of Agriculture for providing poultry and egg grading
services shall be deposited into the State Treasury. Upon receipt of the
funds, the Treasurer of State shall monthly credit them as special revenues
to an account to be known as the “Poultry and Egg Grading Fund”, to be used
for salaries, expenses, equipment, maintenance, operation, and administrative
expenses of the Poultry and Egg Grading Program of the commission as provided
by law.
(b) All funds collected by the commission Department of Agriculture
from poultry and egg processors for poultry and egg grading and egg products
inspection services shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special
revenues and shall be credited to the Poultry and Egg Grading Fund to be used
for funding the poultry and egg grading and egg products inspection program
and to make payments to the United States Department of Agriculture for
poultry and egg grading and poultry products inspection services performed by
employees of the United States Department of Agriculture.

2-33-308. Overtime compensation.
The Department of Agriculture is hereby authorized to pay ordinary,
customary, and necessary overtime compensation in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to those employees,
including egg and poultry grader supervisors, engaged in the inspection and
grading of eggs and poultry products under the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
Commission's Poultry and Egg Grading Program.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 2-34-106(b)(2), concerning the holding of
funds following a sale of livestock under questionable ownership, is
repealed.
(2)(A) If ownership of the animal is not established within
thirty (30) days, the funds shall be sent to the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission to be held for one (1) year from the date of receipt by
the commission.
(B) If ownership of the animal cannot be ascertained
during the one-year period stated in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section,
then after the expiration of the one-year period, the funds shall be
deposited into the Livestock and Poultry Fund Account.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 2-34-203 is amended to read as follows:
2-34-203. Conflicts of brands.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health
shall serve as an adjusting committee in the matter of determining conflicts
of brands, and the decision of the committee board shall be final.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code §§ 2-34-205 and 2-34-206 are amended to read
as follows:
2-34-205. Custody of county brand records.
(a) All county brand records of the various counties of the state
shall be property of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, and it
shall be unlawful for a county clerk to accept a brand for registry.
(b) The Department of Agriculture shall collect all county brand
record books and place them in its office and preserve them as public records
on behalf of the commission.
(c) The department shall furnish a record of any brand record in the
county record books to any person for a reasonable fee determined by the
department to offset the costs of furnishing the record.

2-34-206. State Brand Book.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of
Agriculture shall publish the State Brand Book on its website, which shall
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
contain a facsimile of each brand and mark that is registered with the
commission department showing the name and address of the owner, together
with the pertinent laws and rules pertaining to registration and
reregistration of brands and marks.
(b) The commission, on or before January 1, 1960, and every five (5)
years thereafter, shall publish the State Brand Book showing all the brands
recorded with the commission before December 1, 1959, and every five (5)
years thereafter.
(c) Supplements to the State Brand Book shall be published annually.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 2-34-208 is amended to read as follows:
2-34-208. Registration of brands.
(a) A person desiring to adopt a brand or to continue to use a brand
shall apply to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of
Agriculture for the registration of the brand in the manner prescribed in
this section.
(b) The commission department shall prepare a standard form, which
shall be made available to those persons who desire to apply for a brand.
(c) An applicant shall show a front, rear, left, and right side view
of the animals upon which the brand will be eligible for registry.
(d) The brand location shall be designated in the following body
regions: head, right jaw, neck, shoulder, rib and right and left jaw, neck,
shoulder, rib and neck, right and left hip, thigh, and breeching.
(e) The applicant shall select at least three (3):
(1) Distinct brands and list them in the preferred order; and
(2) Locations on the animal and list them in preferred order.
(f) Applications for registration or reregistration shall be properly
signed and notarized and accompanied by a reasonable fee to be determined by
the commission department to offset the costs of administering this section.
(g) A brand, if approved and accepted by the commission department for
registry, shall be of good standing during the five-year period in which it
is recorded.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 2-34-210 is repealed.
2-34-210. Sale of book.
(a) The State Brand Book and all supplements to the State Brand Book,
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
for a five-year period, shall be sold to the public for a reasonable fee to
be determined by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to offset the
costs of producing the State Brand Book.
(b) A supplement to the State Brand Book shall be sold to the public
for a reasonable fee determined by the Department of Agriculture to offset
the costs of producing the supplement.
(c) The county clerk and the sheriff of each county shall receive
copies of the State Brand Book and all supplements to the State Brand Book
without cost to their county.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 2-34-212 is amended to read as follows:
2-34-212. Transfers of registered brands.
(a)(1) Only brands appearing in the current edition of the State Brand
Book and the supplements to the current edition of the State Brand Book on
the website of the Department of Agriculture shall be subject to sale,
assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest, the same as other personal
property.
(2)(A) The transfer of title shall be recorded with the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission department.
(B) The fee for recording a transfer of title shall be
determined by the commission department based on the costs of administering
this section.
(b)(1) All persons selling livestock branded with their brand recorded
in a current edition of the State Brand Book or supplements to the current
edition of the State Brand Book on the department's website shall execute a
written transfer of ownership to the purchaser.
(2) If the purchaser suffers damages due to seller's failure to
execute a written transfer of ownership, then the seller is liable for the
damages decided upon by a court of competent jurisdiction.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 2-34-214 is repealed.
2-34-214. Contracts for administration.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall enter into
a contract with a private entity that operates primarily as a livestock
association to administer the registration and recording of marks and brands
under this subchapter.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(2) When the commission enters into a contract under this
subsection, the commission shall:
(A) Compensate the private entity for its services;
(B) Appoint the private entity as an agent of the
commission for purposes of receiving fees allowed under this subchapter; and
(C) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section,
direct the private entity to perform duties assigned to the commission or the
Deputy Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission under this
subchapter.
(b) The commission shall not contract with a private entity to
promulgate rules or set fees under this subchapter.
(c) Records concerning the administration of this subchapter are
subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.,
regardless of whether the records are in the custody or control of the
commission or a private entity acting as an agent of the commission under
this section.
(d) A private entity entering into a contract with the commission
under this section shall:
(1) Make a monthly accounting to the commission of all funds
received by the private entity as an agency of the commission under this
section; and
(2) File with the commission a surety bond of a corporate surety
authorized to do business in this state in an amount determined by the
commission, conditioned on the faithful performance of the private entity's
duties and obligations as an agent of the commission under this subchapter.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 2-38-302(a)(2)(A)(ii), concerning the
imposition of a civil penalty by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission for failing to retrieve trespassing livestock, is amended to read
as follows:
(ii) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per violation of this chapter or violation of any rules
promulgated under this chapter.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 2-38-502(a)(3), concerning verification by
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission of a valid permit related to
feral hogs, is amended to read as follows:
(3) After providing verification that he or she has a valid
permit issued under rules established by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health in accordance with 16 U.S.C. § 742j-1, as
it existed on January 1, 2019, upon determining that the permit applicant has
a bona fide need to kill feral hogs for protection of land, water, wildlife,
livestock, domesticated animals, human life, or crops, and not for a
recreational hunting purpose.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 2-38-503 is amended to read as follows:
2-38-503. Animal health requirements.
A feral hog shall be subject to animal health requirements established
by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 2-38-505 is amended to read as follows:
2-38-505. Powers and duties of Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health
may:
(1) Make, modify, and enforce the rules and orders the
commission board deems necessary to effectively carry out this subchapter;
(2) Establish and collect reasonable fees to administer and
enforce § 2-38-502(a)(3); and
(3)(A) Impose administrative penalties not to exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000) per feral hog against a person who violates this
subchapter or a rule adopted by the commission board under this subchapter.
(B) The imposition of administrative penalties shall be
conducted under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 2-40-103 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-103. Duties and enforcement.
(a) It is the duty of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health to:
(1) Inquire into and investigate all outbreaks of contagious or
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
infectious disease of animals;
(2) Establish and promulgate rules in regard to isolation or
quarantine of infected animals, disinfection of animals and premises,
destruction of incurably diseased animals, and disposal of carcasses as it
may deem necessary to prevent the spread of disease;
(3) Promulgate rules for the protection of areas from which
animal diseases may be eradicated; and
(4) Draft rules for compensation for owners of exposed or
diseased animals and contaminated equipment or other material unsuitable for
proper disinfection or destroyed, or for others for any other necessary
expenses or for any other purpose, indemnity being subject to available
funds.
(b) Any federal veterinary inspector working in Arkansas cooperating
with the commission Department of Agriculture shall have the power of
enforcing the rules of the commission board.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 2-40-106 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-106. Examinations and findings.
(a)(1) Any veterinary inspector or other employee duly authorized by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture shall
have the privilege of entering upon any property or premises in this state
for the purpose of examining or testing animals which he or she has reason to
believe are affected with a contagious or infectious disease so as to
constitute a menace to the livestock and poultry of the community.
(2) He or she may call on one (1) or more peace officers. It
shall be their duty to give him or her all assistance in their power.
(b)(1) When ordered by the State Veterinarian, owners or persons in
charge of animals shall assemble them at a designated time and place for the
purpose of examining, testing, treating, necropsy, disinfecting, or for any
other purpose.
(2)(A) If after examination of suspected animals the veterinary
inspector shall find them to be affected with any reportable disease, he or
she shall furnish the owner or person in charge of the animals with a report
of his or her findings and with a copy of the existing law and rules of the
commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health in regard to the disease.
(B) Any person who, after notification, shall fail to
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
comply with the rules shall be guilty of an administrative penalty. He or she
shall also be liable for damages to others due to infection from his or her
stock.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 2-40-109 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-109. Destruction of diseased poultry flocks.
(a) When the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of
Agriculture determines that any flock of chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, or
other poultry is infected with a reportable disease, the flock may be
depopulated or condemned and properly disposed of to prevent the spread of
the disease.
(b) The commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health is authorized to
adopt rules to prescribe the procedures for condemning a diseased poultry
flock as authorized in this section.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code §§ 2-40-206 through 2-40-210 are amended to
read as follows:
2-40-206. Funding of bovine disease program.
(a)(1)(A) In order to fund or partially fund the bovine disease
control and eradication program, there is levied a fee of one dollar ($1.00)
per head on all cattle sold in this state to be used for the bovine disease
control and eradication program.
(B)(i) However, if the Director of the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health determines there is an
emergency, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health may promulgate a rule to temporarily raise the fee set in subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section after receiving approval of the rule from the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee.
(ii) A rule adopted to raise the fee under this
subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be effective only during the period of time the
emergency persists or for one (1) year, whichever is shorter.
(iii) If an emergency persists after one (1) year,
the commission board may promulgate a rule to extend the increased fee for
additional one-year periods by following the procedures stated in subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section each year the rule increasing the fee is to be
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
effective.
(iv) The commission board shall not adopt an
emergency rule to raise the fee under this subdivision (a)(1)(B).
(2) The fee shall not be assessed on the resale of any cattle
within ten (10) calendar days after the prior sale if the fee was paid on the
prior sale.
(b)(1) The fee shall be collected by the purchaser and remitted
monthly to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration,
except that if the sale occurs through a livestock auction market or any
other agent of the seller, the livestock auction market or other agent shall
collect and remit the fee. The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may promulgate such rules as he or she deems necessary to
implement the collection of the fee.
(2)(A) After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the
Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund, the
remainder of funds so remitted to the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special
revenues and credited to the Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health
Disease and Pest Control Fund.
(B) Before the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount of funds which will remain at
the end of the fiscal year in the Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal
Health Disease and Pest Control Fund from fees collected under the provisions
of this section. He or she shall allow such funds to be carried forward and
made available for the same purposes in the next-succeeding fiscal year.
(C) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall release all information related to the fee levied per
head on all cattle sold in the state to be used for the bovine disease
control and eradication fund when requested by the Secretary of the
Department of Agriculture.

2-40-207. Costs of on-the-farm calfhood vaccinations.
The costs of on-the-farm calfhood vaccination performed by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture shall be paid from
state or federal funds. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a
livestock owner from contracting with and compensating a veterinarian for
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
vaccinating his or her livestock. Veterinarians shall not charge both the
livestock owner and the state or federal government for the same calfhood
vaccination.

2-40-208. Inspection of livestock markets.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall prescribe minimum sanitary and health standards for livestock
markets in the state to promote and protect the health of livestock handled
at these markets and the health of personnel working in the markets.
(2) The commission Department of Agriculture or its agents shall
periodically inspect the markets for compliance with the sanitary and health
standards.
(b)(1) If the commission department or its agents find that any market
is not in compliance with such standards, it shall notify the operator of the
market, in writing, of areas in which the market is out of compliance.
(2) The market operator shall, within fifteen (15) days after
receipt of the notice, certify to the commission department the steps it has
taken to comply with the standards.
(c)(1)(A) If the operator fails to respond or if the commission
department or its agents determine that the market has not complied with the
health, safety, and sanitation standards, the board may order the market
shall be inspected by a committee consisting of:
(i) One (1) livestock market representative;
(ii) Two (2) livestock producers; and
(iii) The State Veterinarian.
(B) Members of the committee shall be appointed by the
chair of the commission, and these members shall be from outside the
livestock market's trade area.
(2) If the committee finds that the market does not meet the
prescribed sanitary standards, the commission shall order the market closed
immediately until the market is found to be in compliance with the health and
sanitation standards.
(3) Members of the commission may receive expense reimbursement
and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq closed until the market is
found to be in compliance with the health, safety, and sanitation standards.

03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
2-40-209. Quarantine — Violations.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health is authorized to adopt appropriate rules regarding the isolation or
quarantine of infected, exposed, or suspected infected livestock or poultry.
(b) Any person or entity who violates the quarantine rules lawfully
promulgated by the commission board shall be subject to an administrative
penalty.

2-40-210. Control and eradication of brucellosis.
(a)(1) Any bovine herd infected with or directly exposed to
brucellosis shall be depopulated at the discretion of and subject to the
rules of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health.
(2) The herd or herds shall be identified and destroyed within
thirty (30) days of written order to the owner or owners.
(3)(A) The owners will be notified by delivery of the order or
by certified mail.
(B) One (1) extension of thirty (30) days, if presented in
writing to the commission Department of Agriculture, will be considered in
extenuating circumstances.
(b) The commission board shall adopt appropriate rules concerning
depopulation, negotiation, and hearing procedures.
(c)(1) The State Veterinarian or his or her designated representative
will negotiate with the owner through the use of available federal and state
funds to depopulate brucellosis-infected or exposed bovine herds.
(2) If the State Veterinarian and the herd owner are unable to
arrive at an agreement to depopulate infected or exposed bovine herds, the
commission board, on advice of the State Veterinarian and in public meeting,
is authorized to issue a written order to depopulate a herd and to provide
indemnification to the herd owner at the current established per-head rate,
with such indemnification to be paid from federal and state funds available
therefor.
(3)(A) Should the herd owner desire, the commission board will
hear testimony by the owner and any witnesses he or she desires to present
arguments as to why the herd or herds should not be depopulated.
(B) Following the hearing, the commission board shall
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
determine whether to affirm or repeal its order to depopulate.
(d) Any person or entity who violates the provisions of this section
shall be subject to an administrative penalty.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 2-40-401 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-401. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Approved incineration” means a method of incineration
approved by the commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health;
(2) “Commission” means the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission created by § 2-33-101;
(3) “Fowl” shall include all domesticated avian species;
(4)(3) “Fowl carcasses” means carcasses of fowl which died as
the result of sickness, suffocation, accident, or from any cause other than
intentional slaughter; and
(5)(4) “Responsible person” means the person who has the direct
responsibility for the day-to-day care of the fowl involved.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code §§ 2-40-403 and 2-40-404 are amended to read
as follows:
2-40-403. Requirements.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health
shall, by rule, specify acceptable methods for the disposal of fowl
carcasses, including, but not limited to:
(1) Composting of carcasses;
(2) Cremation or incineration;
(3) On-farm freezing; and
(4) Rendering.

2-40-404. Specifications.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health
shall, by rule, specify acceptable methods of the disposal of fowl carcasses
in the event of a major die-off.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 2-40-508 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-508. Legislative intent.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture will continue to vaccinate
heifers on the farm and at the sale barns for brucellosis and will carry out
all the practices of the commission which have brought the state to its
current near brucellosis-free status.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(1), concerning the definition of
"accredited veterinarian" under the equine infectious anemia law, is amended
to read as follows:
(1) “Accredited veterinarian” means a veterinarian licensed by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health and
approved by the United States Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service to
perform functions required for state or cooperative state and federal animal
disease control and eradication programs;

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(6), concerning the definition of
"authorized agent" under the equine infectious anemia law, is amended to read
as follows:
(6) “Authorized agent” means a person who has been authorized by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture to
act on its behalf in making investigations and inspections and performing
other services or acts which have been defined by this subchapter;

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(8), concerning the definition of
"certified equine infectious anemia verifier" or "certified EIA verifier"
under the equine infectious anemia law, is amended to read as follows:
(8) “Certified equine infectious anemia verifier” or “certified
EIA verifier” means any certificate holder having completed the prescribed
training course co-sponsored by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission, the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service, and the
Arkansas Horse Council, Inc.;

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(9), concerning the definition of
"commission" under the equine infectious anemia law, is repealed.
(9) “Commission” means the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission;
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(21), concerning the definition of
"official equine infectious anemia test" or "official EIA test" under the
equine infectious anemia law, is amended to read as follows:
(21) “Official equine infectious anemia test” or “official EIA
test” means the agar gel immunodiffusion (AGID) test, also known as the
“Coggins” test, the competitive enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (CELISA)
test, the synthetic antigen enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (SA-ELISA) test
and any other United States Department of Agriculture licensed tests approved
by the commission Department of Agriculture;

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(23)(A), concerning the definition
of "permit" or "permit for movement" under the equine infectious anemia law,
is amended to read as follows:
(23)(A) “Permit” or “permit for movement” means an official
document issued by the commission Department of Agriculture, a representative
of a Veterinary Services Endorsement Office, or an accredited veterinarian
authorizing the movement of a reactor or exposed equidae to a quarantined
holding facility, an approved slaughter facility, or approved quarantined
premise.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(24), concerning the definition of
"quarantine" under the equine infectious anemia law, is amended to read as
follows:
(24) “Quarantine” means a written notice or order issued by the
commission Department of Agriculture showing the boundaries of the area or
premise affected, the equidae restricted, and the restrictions, if any;

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(25), concerning the definition of
"quarantined holding facility" under the equine infectious anemia law, is
amended to read as follows:
(25) “Quarantined holding facility” means a quarantined premise
approved by the commission Department of Agriculture to handle reactors or
exposed equidae;

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(27), concerning the definition of
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
"regulatory veterinarian" under the equine infectious anemia law, is amended
to read as follows:
(27) “Regulatory veterinarian” means a veterinarian employed by
or acting as an agent for the commission Department of Agriculture; and.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 2-40-801(28), concerning the definition of
"research facility" under the equine infectious anemia law, is repealed.
(28) “Research facility” means any facility that meets or
exceeds the standards and requirements set forth by United States Animal and
Plant Health Inspection Services and the commission for equine infectious
anemia research.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 2-40-804(a)(3), concerning the written
proof of a negative current official equine infectious anemia test, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) Written proof of a negative current official equine
infectious anemia test shall be made available in the form of negative
results from an approved laboratory upon request made by an authorized
representative of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of
Agriculture or the owner, lessee, or caretaker of a neighboring herd.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 2-40-804(b)(2), concerning the failure to
furnish proof of negative current official equine infectious anemia test, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) After January 1, 1998, failure to furnish proof of negative
current official equine infectious anemia test to an authorized agent of the
commission department may result in quarantine and penalties prescribed by §
2-40-826 and § 2-40-827 [repealed].

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code §§ 2-40-805 through 2-40-809 are amended to
read as follows:
2-40-805. Equidae identification requirements.
All equidae domiciled within Arkansas and over the age of six (6)
months or weaned from a mare shall be positively identified on the official
equine infectious anemia test form by an accredited veterinarian or an agent
of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture by
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
means of distinctive markings, color patterns, previous brand, previous
tattoo, previously implanted electronic transponder number, permanent scars,
other blemishes, cowlicks, whorls, lip tattoo, hot brand or freeze brand
before an equine infectious anemia test.

2-40-806. Authority to require test.
Any equidae which have been within four hundred forty yards (440 yds.)
of a reactor shall be subject to testing by the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture, the State Veterinarian, or
their agents if the exposure to the reactor occurred no more than thirty (30)
days before the testing of the reactor.

2-40-807. Personnel authorized to collect blood samples.
All samples collected from equidae for equine infectious anemia testing
shall be collected by an accredited veterinarian, the State Veterinarian, or
other Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission-authorized personnel
authorized by the Department of Agriculture.

2-40-808. Submission of sample and test charts.
(a) All blood samples submitted for official equine infectious anemia
tests must be accompanied by a properly completed VS Form 10-11 (Equine
Infectious Anemia Laboratory Test Form) or other form prescribed by the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture.
(b) Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be
demonstrated through presentation of:
(1) The original test record document;
(2) An official electronic copy, as defined by the commission
Arkansas Board of Animal Health; and
(3) Other forms as may be prescribed by the commission board.

2-40-809. Requirements for Arkansas-approved equine infectious anemia
testing laboratories.
No person, firm, or corporation shall initiate operation of an equine
infectious anemia testing laboratory without first obtaining approval from
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture.

03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 2-40-812(a), concerning the quarantine of
reactors under the equine infectious anemia law, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) All reactors shall be quarantined by an authorized agent of the
commission Department of Agriculture to the premises of origin or other
premises designated by the owner and approved by the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission department.
(2) The quarantine shall restrict the reactors, all other
equidae on the premises, and all equidae epidemiologically determined by the
commission department to have been exposed to a reactor.
(3) All equidae on affected premises shall be isolated at least
four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) away from all equidae on adjacent
premises and at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) from any public
road.
(4) It is the responsibility of the owner of reactors to
maintain those animals in isolation at least four hundred forty yards (440
yds.) away from any public road and all other equidae.
(5) The quarantine may be released by an authorized agent of the
commission department after all quarantined equidae in the affected herd test
negative to an official equine infectious anemia test not less than sixty
(60) days nor more than eighty (80) days following the identification and
removal of the last reactor, or as determined by the designated
epidemiologist.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 2-40-815(a), concerning the testing
requirements for affected herds under the equine infectious anemia law, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) All equidae determined to have been on the same premises as a
reactor at the time the reactor was bled shall be tested by an accredited
veterinarian or an authorized agent of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Department of Agriculture at the owner's expense sixty to eighty
(60-80) days after the reactor's last positive test result.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 2-40-816(d) and (e), concerning the
movement of reactors and exposed animals under the equine infectious anemia
law, are amended to read as follows:
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(d)(1) Any other move such as a change in location of a reactor or
exposed equidae to an alternate quarantined premise must be approved in
advance following an epidemiological investigation by the State Veterinarian
or other designated Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of
Agriculture personnel.
(2) The movement must also be accompanied by a permit for
movement.
(e) If a change in destination becomes necessary, a new permit must be
issued by commission-authorized department personnel or the regulatory
veterinarian.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 2-40-817 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-817. Requirements for quarantined holding facilities.
(a)(1) A person desiring to operate a quarantined holding facility
must file an application for approval of the facility on forms provided by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture.
(2) The facility must have an area where equidae testing
positive to an official equine infectious anemia test and exposed equidae are
kept, and where the equidae are isolated and confined at least four hundred
forty yards (440 yds.) from all other equidae at all times.
(3) The facility must be approved by the commission department
under an inspection of the premises before the issuance of the license.
(b) Failure to maintain the reactors and exposed equidae in
confinement and isolation at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) from
all other equidae at all times is a violation of this subchapter.
(c)(1) All equidae held in a quarantined holding facility must be
shipped directly to an approved slaughter facility without diversion.
(2) An animal moved from a quarantined holding facility may not
go through any livestock auction facility before shipment to slaughter.
(3) All movements from a quarantined holding facility must be
accompanied by a permit for movement.
(d) All equidae entering or within an approved quarantine holding
facility shall be branded or show evidence of an “S” brand on the top of the
left hip or a “71A” brand or other brand prescribed by the commission
department on the left shoulder or neck, not less than two inches (2″) in
height.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(e) No equidae may be held over twenty (20) days.
(f) A quarantine pen must be clearly identified by a sign or paint
using the word “Quarantined” on all sides. Letters of the sign must be a
minimum of one foot (1′) in height.
(g) Failure to comply with this subchapter shall be cause for
cancellation of approval by the commission department.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code §§ 2-40-819 through 2-40-821 are amended to
read as follows:
2-40-819. Testing requirements for change of ownership.
(a)(1)(A) All equidae which are sold, bartered, traded, given free of
charge, or offered for sale, or any horses otherwise exchanged for any reason
within Arkansas except at approved markets must be accompanied by a record of
a negative equine infectious anemia test conducted at an approved laboratory
within the previous six (6) months.
(B) Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may
be demonstrated through presentation of:
(i) The original test record document;
(ii) An official electronic copy, as defined by the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health; and
(iii) Other forms as may be prescribed by the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission board.
(C) A foal less than six (6) months of age is exempt from
the testing requirements if the foal is accompanied by, nursing, and included
in change of ownership with a negative tested mare.
(D) A foal sold separately is required to have a negative
current official equine infectious anemia test.
(2) On all private sales, trades, or barters, that is, any sale
other than through an approved market, both the buyer and seller are equally
and individually responsible for meeting the equine infectious anemia testing
requirements before the sale or change of ownership.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
with respect to a horse claimed in a claiming race run at a licensed
racetrack regulated by the Arkansas Racing Commission, the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission board may require:
(1) The negative equine infectious anemia test to have been
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
conducted at an approved laboratory within the previous twelve (12) months,
rather than the previous six (6) months;
(2) Any negative equine infectious anemia test required to be
conducted within the last six (6) months to be conducted after the race and
after title and risk of loss have passed to the buyer; or
(3) That the requirements of both subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of
this section be met.

2-40-820. Movement of equidae through approved market.
(a) All equidae offered for sale or sold at approved markets must:
(1) Be accompanied by written proof of a negative equine
infectious anemia test conducted within the last six (6) months;
(2) Have a blood sample collected by an accredited veterinarian
and test negative to an official equine infectious anemia test performed by
an approved laboratory before the animal leaves the market;
(3) Have a blood sample collected by an accredited veterinarian
or an authorized agent of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Department of Agriculture at the market and be quarantined to the market
until negative results are received from an approved laboratory;
(4) Be “S” branded and consigned to slaughter before receiving
test results; or
(5) Be allowed to return to their premises of origin before
unloading and before consignment and be quarantined to the premises of origin
until tested negative. The equidae must be tested within thirty (30) days.
(b) Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be
demonstrated through presentation of:
(1) The original test record document;
(2) An official electronic copy, as defined by the commission
Arkansas Board of Animal Health; and
(3) Other forms as may be prescribed by the commission board.
(c) A foal less than six (6) months of age sold with and nursing a
negative-tested mare is exempt from the testing requirements of this
subchapter.
(d)(1) A known reactor or known exposed equidae shall not be consigned
for sale at an approved market unless permitted by authorized commission
department personnel.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(2) An animal which is found to be a reactor or exposed through
testing conducted at an approved market must be maintained in a quarantine
pen and isolated from all other equidae in the sale facility.
(3)(A) The quarantine pen must be clearly identified by sign or
paint using the word “Quarantined” on all sides.
(B) Letters must be one foot (1′) high.
(e) It is the market owner's responsibility to make sure that all
equines sold meet these requirements.

2-40-821. Requirements of equidae participating in equine activities.
(a) All equidae moving within the state to equidae exhibitions,
including, but not limited to, fairs, livestock shows, breed association
shows, rodeos, trail rides, parades, team pennings, team ropings, racetracks,
or other equidae concentration points shall be accompanied by a record of a
negative current official equine infectious anemia test within the past
twelve (12) months.
(b) Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be
demonstrated through presentation of:
(1) The original test record document;
(2) An official electronic copy, as defined by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health; and
(3) Other forms as may be prescribed by the commission board.
(c) Any individual, club, organization, or association conducting an
equine activity shall arrange for a certified equine infectious anemia
verifier to be present at the event to verify that each of the equidae is
accompanied by a record of a negative current official equine infectious
anemia test if:
(1) The event charges a fee of any kind, including an entry fee,
a gate fee, a membership fee, a registration fee, a user fee, a camping fee,
or a grounds fee;
(2) The event provides prize money, trophies, plaques, ribbons,
points, or awards of any kind, including jackpot and benefits; or
(3) The event causes a concentration of more than fifty (50)
equidae.
(d) Any show or event within the state may require any additional
tests or additional requirements deemed necessary.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 2-40-826 is amended to read as follows:
2-40-826. Equine infectious anemia services.
(a) In order to fund or partially fund the Equine Infectious Anemia
Control and Eradication Program, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health may, by appropriately adopted
administrative rules, design and maintain a fee structure for the purpose of
defraying the cost of services performed.
(b) The fees collected shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
special revenues and shall be credited to the Livestock and Poultry Animal
Health Equine Infectious Anemia Control Fund created on the books of the
Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 2-40-829 is repealed.
2-40-829. Research facility certification required.
Any research facility in this state which contains equidae infected
with equine infectious anemia or any reactor equidae shall be certified by
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and shall be so maintained as
to prevent the infection of any other equidae, whether at or outside the
research facility.

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 2-40-1201(c), concerning the disposition
of funds into the Livestock and Poultry Commission Swine Testing Fund, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the
Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund, the
remainder of funds so remitted to the secretary shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Livestock and Poultry
Commission Animal Health Swine Testing Fund.

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code §§ 2-40-1301 and 2-40-1302 are amended to
read as follows:
2-40-1301. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Commission” means the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
Commission created by § 2-33-101;
(2) “Large animal” means cattle, horses, hogs, sheep, goats,
cervidae, bison, llamas, alpacas, ostriches, emus, rheas, and other native or
nonnative animals, excluding dogs and cats; and
(3)(2) “Large animal carcasses” means carcasses of large animals
which died as the result of sickness, suffocation, accident, or from any
cause other than intentional slaughter.

2-40-1302. Disposal.
(a)(1) All large animal carcasses and all parts of large animal
carcasses shall be disposed of in a manner prescribed by rules of the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health.
(2) However, no large animal carcass shall be buried or
otherwise disposed of in any landfill operated under a permit issued by the
Division of Environmental Quality.
(b) If a person or entity conducts a farming activity at more than one
(1) location, it shall not be necessary for such person or entity to have a
disposal ditch or facility at each location unless specified by the State
Veterinarian.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 17-80-106(a), concerning investigations
and inspections of alleged wrongdoing related to medical professions, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board, the Arkansas State Board of
Dental Examiners, the Arkansas State Board of Nursing, the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health, the Arkansas Board of
Podiatric Medicine, the State Board of Optometry, and the Arkansas State
Board of Physical Therapy are authorized to utilize as their employees, as
the investigators for the purposes described in this section, the
investigators and inspectors of the Division of Pharmacy Services and Drug
Control of the Department of Health.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 17-101-102(9), concerning the definition
of "licensed veterinarian" under the law concerning veterinarians and
veterinary technicians, is amended to read as follows:
(9) “Licensed veterinarian” means a person who is validly and
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state as a general
practitioner or in a specialty area as the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health may by rule provide;

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 17-101-102(11)(D)(i), concerning the
exclusion of certain personnel related to the collection of blood or other
samples under the definition of "practice of veterinary medicine" under the
law concerning veterinarians and veterinary technicians, is amended to read
as follows:
(i) Unlicensed personnel employed by the United
States Department of Agriculture or the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Department of Agriculture in disease control programs carried out
under the authority of the United States Department of Agriculture or the
State of Arkansas; and

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 17-101-102(20)(B), concerning the
exclusion of certain practices under the definition of "veterinary
technology" under the law concerning veterinarians and veterinary
technicians, is amended to read as follows:
(B) “Veterinary technology” does not include diagnosis,
prognosis, surgery, or the prescription of appliances, drugs, medications, or
treatment unless otherwise determined by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health.

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 17-101-203 is amended to read as follows:
17-101-203. Powers and duties.
The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health
shall have the power to:
(1) Examine and determine the qualifications and fitness of
applicants for a license to practice general veterinary medicine or any
specialty area thereof, and the certification of veterinary technicians in
Arkansas, and issue, renew, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses or
certificates, or otherwise discipline veterinarians or veterinary
technicians;
(2) Subpoena witnesses and take testimony bearing on the records
of applicants for permits or for licenses to practice veterinary medicine in
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
the State of Arkansas;
(3) Establish annually a schedule of license and permit fees
based on the commission's board's financial requirements for the ensuing
year;
(4) Conduct investigations into matters brought before the
commission board and proceed on the commission's board's own motion to a
hearing or other disciplinary action;
(5) Purchase or rent necessary office space, equipment, and
supplies;
(6)(5)(A) Promulgate and enforce rules necessary to establish
recognized standards for the practice of veterinary medicine and to carry out
the provisions of this chapter.
(B) The commission board shall make available to
interested members of the public copies of this chapter and all rules
promulgated by the commission board;
(7)(6) Examine and evaluate qualifications of education, skill,
and experience for certification of a person as a veterinary technician and
for annual registration of employment;
(8)(7) Regulate all veterinarians in a corporate practice and
prevent corporate or noncorporate holdings from being sold to, directed by,
or controlled by a nonveterinarian;
(9)(A)(8)(A) Hold hearings on all matters properly brought
before the commission board and, in connection thereto, administer oaths,
receive evidence, make the necessary determinations, and enter orders
consistent with the findings.
(B) The commission board may require by subpoena the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of papers, records,
or other documentary evidence and commission board depositions;
(10)(9) Bring proceedings in the courts for the enforcement of
this chapter or any rules made under this chapter; and
(11)(10) Promulgate rules:
(A) Limiting the amount of Schedule II narcotics that may
be prescribed and dispensed by licensees of the commission board; and
(B) Outlining the use of telehealth and telemedicine in
the practice of veterinary medicine.

03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 17-101-205(d)(4)(A), concerning the
contents of agreements under the Rural Veterinary Student Scholarship Program
related to the full-time practice of veterinary medicine, is amended to read
as follows:
(4)(A) Upon failure to satisfy the obligation to engage in the
full-time practice of veterinary medicine as required by subdivision (d)(2)
of this section, repay to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
department, within ninety (90) days of the failure to satisfy the obligation
to engage in the full-time practice of veterinary medicine, the amount equal
to the amount awarded to the person, less a prorated amount based on any
periods of practice of veterinary medicine that meet the requirements of this
section, plus interest calculated at the prime rate of interest plus two
percent (2%) from the date the award was received.

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code §§ 17-101-301 through 17-101-312, as amended
by Acts 2025, No. 19, are amended to read as follows:
17-101-301. Veterinarians — Application — Qualifications.
(a) Any veterinarian or licensed veterinarian desiring a license to
practice veterinary medicine in this state may make written application to
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture
showing that he or she is:
(1) At least twenty-one (21) years of age; and
(2) A person of moral integrity and acceptable ethical
standards.
(b) The application for licensure to practice veterinary medicine in
the State of Arkansas shall:
(1) Be written;
(2) Be signed by the applicant;
(3) Be submitted to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission department at least thirty (30) days before the exam;
(4) Be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee
established by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health; and
(5) Include, but not be limited to, the information set forth
below:
(A) A current photograph of the applicant;
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(B) A certified transcript of the applicant's veterinary
school records;
(C) A copy of the applicant's diploma from an accredited
veterinary school or an affidavit from the dean of an accredited veterinary
school certifying the applicant's ability to graduate if he or she has not
graduated at the time of application. However, a copy of the diploma must be
submitted upon availability and before the exam date;
(D) An Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary
Graduates Certificate or an equivalent program approved by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health, if applicable; and
(E)(i) A National Board Exam score and Clinical Competency
Test score or the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination score, or
its future equivalent, reported through the Veterinary Information
Verification Agency, or its future equivalent.
(ii) The Clinical Competency Test is not required
for a poultry specialty license.
(c)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health by rule may require that all applicants for licensure by examination
complete a preceptorship program during their senior year under the
supervision of a veterinarian licensed and in good standing in any state,
territory, or district of the United States.
(2) The supervising veterinarian shall submit an affidavit to
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission department stating that the
applicant has satisfactorily completed the preceptorship.
(d)(1) If the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission department
finds that the applicant possesses the proper qualifications, the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission department shall admit him or her to the
next examination.
(2) If an applicant is found unqualified to take the examination
or to receive a license without examination, the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission department shall immediately notify the applicant in
writing of its findings and the grounds for same.

17-101-302. Veterinarians — Examinations.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health, at such times as it may designate, shall conduct an examination of
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
applicants for license to practice veterinary medicine in the State of
Arkansas.
(2) All examinations shall be:
(A) In writing, supplemented by oral interviews and
practical examinations as the commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health may
deem necessary; and
(B) So conducted as to ensure absolute impartiality in
grading.
(b) The commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health hereby adopts the
National Board Examination and the Clinical Competency Test, or the North
American Veterinary Licensing Examination, or its future equivalent, as a
basis for licensure in the State of Arkansas, along with a written
examination conducted by the commission Department of Agriculture.
(c) The commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health requires that all
applicants for licensure to practice veterinary medicine in the State of
Arkansas shall pass the National Board Examination and the Clinical
Competency Test, or the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination, or
its future equivalent, in addition to any and all state examinations, written
examinations, oral interviews, and practical demonstrations as the commission
Arkansas Board of Animal Health may request or require.
(d) All applicants are required to complete a written examination
conducted by the commission Department of Agriculture composed of, but not
limited to:
(1) The Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice Act, § 17-101-101
et seq.;
(2) State and federal statutes relating to prescription and
controlled drugs;
(3) Ethics of veterinary medicine; and
(4) Rules and regulations of the commission Arkansas Board of
Animal Health, the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States
Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, and rabies control.
(e)(1) Poultry specialty applicants shall sit for a written
examination conducted by the commission Department of Agriculture on poultry
veterinary medicine.
(2) A license will be issued to poultry specialty applicants
with a seventy percent (70%) or better score on the commission Department of
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
Agriculture examination and a passing score on the National Board
Examination, the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination, or its
equivalent.

17-101-303. License without examination or license by endorsement.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of
Agriculture, at its discretion, may issue a license without written
examination to any qualified applicant who furnishes satisfactory evidence
that he or she is a veterinarian and has:
(1) For the five (5) years before filing his or her application,
been a practicing veterinarian and licensed in a state, territory, or
district of the United States having license requirements at the time the
applicant was first licensed which are substantially equivalent to the
requirements of this chapter;
(2) Qualified as a diplomate of a specialty board approved by
the American Veterinary Medical Association;
(3) Been awarded a postgraduate degree in veterinary medicine;
or
(4) Been recognized as an expert in the veterinary profession.
(b) At its discretion, the commission department may examine, orally
or practically, any person applying for a license under this section,
provided that the applicant has had no disciplinary proceedings pending or
completed in another jurisdiction.

17-101-304. Veterinarians — Temporary permit.
(a) The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health or his or her designee may issue without examination a
temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine in this state to a qualified
applicant for a license pending examination and provided that the temporary
permit shall expire the day after the notice or results of the first
examination given after the permit is issued.
(b) A temporary permit may be issued or revoked by majority vote of
the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health.

17-101-305. Veterinarians — Denial, suspension, or revocation of
license.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(a) Upon written complaint by any person or on the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission's Board of Animal Health's own motion and after notice
and hearing as prescribed in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq., the commission board may deny, suspend for a definite period,
revoke the license of any veterinarian, or impose a civil penalty for:
(1) Fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in obtaining a
license or permit;
(2) Adjudication of insanity;
(3) Use of advertising or solicitation which is false,
misleading, or otherwise deemed unprofessional under rules promulgated by the
commission board;
(4)(A) Conviction of a felony listed under § 17-3-102.
(B) A copy of the record of conviction certified by the
clerk of the court entering the conviction shall be conclusive evidence;
(5) Incompetence, gross negligence, or other malpractice in the
practice of veterinary medicine;
(6) Having professional association with or employing any person
practicing veterinary medicine unlawfully;
(7) Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any
test for disease in animals;
(8) Failure to maintain professional premises and equipment in a
clean and sanitary condition in compliance with rules promulgated by the
commission board;
(9) Dishonesty or gross negligence in the inspection of
foodstuffs or in the issuance of health or inspection certificates;
(10) Cruelty to animals;
(11) Unprofessional conduct by violation of a rule promulgated
by the commission board under this chapter;
(12) Being unable to practice as a veterinarian with reasonable
skill and safety to patients because of illness, the use of drugs, alcohol,
narcotics, or chemicals, or as a result of any mental or physical condition;
(13) Revocation, suspension, surrender, or other disciplinary
sanction of a license to practice veterinary medicine by another state,
territory, or district of the United States on grounds other than nonpayment
of a registration fee or suspension of privileges by any other regulatory
agency including the failure to report any such adverse action to the
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
commission board within sixty (60) days of the final action;
(14) The use, prescription, or sale of any veterinary
prescription drug or the prescription of an extra-label use of any over-the-
counter drug in the absence of a valid veterinarian-client-patient
relationship;
(15) Overtreating patients or charging for services which did
not occur unless the services were contracted for in advance or for services
which were not rendered or documented in the patient's records or charging
for services which were not consented to by the owner of the patient or the
owner's agent;
(16)(A) Failing to furnish details of a patient's medical
records to another treating veterinarian, hospital, clinic, owner, or owner's
agent upon proper request or waiver by the owner or owner's agent or failing
to comply with any other law relating to medical records.
(B) However, X-rays prepared by the licensed veterinarian
shall remain the property of the veterinarian and shall be returned upon
request or as otherwise agreed between the veterinarian and client;
(17) Failure of any applicant or licensee to cooperate with the
commission board during any investigation, if the investigation does not
concern the applicant or licensee;
(18) Failure to comply with any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum
from the commission board, or an order of the commission board;
(19) Failure to timely pay license or registration renewal fees
as specified in § 17-101-309;
(20) Violating a probation agreement with the commission board
or any other licensing authority of this state, another state or territory of
the United States, or a federal agency; or
(21) Violating any informal consent agreement for discipline
entered into by an applicant or licensee with the commission board or any
other licensing authority of this state, another state or territory of the
United States, or a federal agency.
(b) At the discretion of the commission board, any person whose
license is suspended or revoked by the commission board under this section
may be relicensed or reinstated by the commission board at any time upon
written application to the commission board showing cause to justify
relicensing or reinstatement.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(c)(1) Upon suspension or revocation of a license, the actual license
certificate must be surrendered to the commission board within thirty (30)
days of the commission's board's order unless the action is appealed and a
stay is issued.
(2) If the commission board prevails upon appeal or the stay is
lifted, the license certificate shall be surrendered within ten (10) days of
the final order of the court.

17-101-306. Veterinary technician, veterinary technologist, and
veterinary technician specialist — Certification.
(a) A person shall not assist in the practice of veterinary medicine
as a veterinary technician or veterinary technologist without first applying
for and obtaining a certification from the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health and having his or her employment with a
licensed veterinarian registered with the commission Arkansas Board of Animal
Health.
(b)(1) An applicant for certification as a veterinary technician or
veterinary technologist in this state may make written application to the
commission Department of Agriculture showing that he or she is:
(A) A citizen of the United States or an applicant for
citizenship; and
(B) A person of moral integrity and acceptable ethical
standards.
(2) The application for certification as a veterinary technician
or veterinary technologist in the State of Arkansas shall be written, signed
by the applicant, and submitted to the commission department at least thirty
(30) days before the examination, including without limitation the
information set forth in this subdivision (b)(2), and the application shall
be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee established by the
commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health:
(A) A current photograph of the applicant;
(B)(i) A copy of the applicant's diploma or its equivalent
from a college-level program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical
Association.
(ii) If the applicant has not graduated at the time
of application, an affidavit from the program certifying the applicant's
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
ability to graduate may be accepted with a copy of the diploma or its
equivalent submitted upon availability;
(C) A certified copy of college transcripts;
(D) A passing score on the National Board Examination or
Veterinary Technician National Examination, or future equivalent, reported
through the American Association of Veterinary State Boards or its successor;
and
(E) A letter of recommendation signed by a veterinarian
who is licensed in this state or another state, territory, or district of the
United States and notarized.
(3) This section does not prevent the commission department from
issuing a certification by endorsement to an applicant who:
(A) Holds a certification, or its equivalent, as a
veterinary technician or veterinary technologist in another state, territory,
or district of the United States;
(B) Is not a respondent in any pending or unresolved board
action in any state, territory, or district of the United States;
(C) Has a passing score on the National Board Examination
or Veterinary Technician National Examination, or its future equivalent,
reported through the American Association of Veterinary State Boards or its
successor;
(D) Submits a completed application, including without
limitation a letter of recommendation that is:
(i) Signed by a veterinarian;
(ii) Notarized by a notary public; and
(iii) Accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee
established by the commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health; and
(E) Signs a statement attesting that he or she has read
and understands this chapter and the rules adopted by the commission Arkansas
Board of Animal Health governing the practice of veterinary medicine in
Arkansas.
(c)(1) A veterinary technician or veterinary technologist shall
annually register his or her employment with the commission department,
stating:
(A) His or her name and current address;
(B) The name and office address of both his or her
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
employer and the supervising licensed veterinarian; and
(C) Any additional information required by the commission
department.
(2) Upon any change of employment as a veterinary technician or
veterinary technologist, the certification is inactive until:
(A) New employment as a veterinary technician or
veterinary technologist has been obtained; and
(B) The commission department has been notified in writing
of the new employment.
(d)(1) A veterinary technician or veterinary technologist shall
perform veterinary technology under the direction, supervision, and
responsibility of the licensed veterinarian with whom he or she is employed.
(2) Supervision of a veterinary technician or veterinary
technologist may be direct supervision, indirect supervision, or immediate
supervision.
(3)(A) A veterinarian who utilizes indirect supervision of a
veterinary technician or veterinary technologist shall:
(i) Retain control of and authority over the care of
the animal; and
(ii) Review all recordkeeping and notes documented
by the veterinary technician or veterinary technologist on the charts
regarding the care of the animal.
(B) When utilizing indirect supervision, a supervising
veterinarian may authorize a veterinary technician or veterinary technologist
to go to a location other than the location of the supervising veterinarian
to provide services based on an emergency call for an animal patient.
(e) The commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health shall promulgate
rules to establish the appropriate level of supervision under which a
veterinary technician or veterinary technologist can perform veterinary
technology.
(f)(1) A licensed veterinarian using, supervising, or employing a
veterinary technician or veterinary technologist is individually responsible
and liable for the performance of the acts and omissions delegated to the
veterinary technician or veterinary technologist.
(2) This subsection does not relieve a veterinary technician or
veterinary technologist of any responsibility and liability for any of his or
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
her own acts and omissions.
(g) A licensed veterinarian shall not establish a separate office or
clinic in a location other than his or her regular office and place the
separate office or clinic under the control or supervision of a veterinary
technician or veterinary technologist.
(h)(1) This section does not prevent a licensed veterinarian from
utilizing the services of an employee to perform services not requiring the
skill and judgment of a veterinary technician, veterinary technologist, or
veterinary technician specialist, if the services performed by the employee
are under the direct personal supervision of a licensed veterinarian.
(2) An employee described under subdivision (h)(1) of this
section shall not be identified as a “veterinary technician”, “animal
technician”, “technician”, “veterinary technologist”, “animal technologist”,
“technologist”, or “veterinary technician specialist”.
(i) A veterinary technician, veterinary technologist, or veterinary
technician specialist shall not receive a fee or other compensation for
veterinary services or veterinary technology services other than the salary
or other compensation paid to the veterinary technician, veterinary
technologist, or veterinary technician specialist by the veterinary clinic,
veterinary practice, or veterinarian by which he or she is employed.

17-101-307. License required — Exemptions.
(a) No person may practice veterinary medicine in this state who is
not a licensed veterinarian or the holder of a valid temporary permit issued
by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health.
(b) This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit:
(1) Employees of the United States Government or state
government or employees of local government who are certified by an agency
approved by the commission board to perform euthanasia from performing their
official duties;
(2) Regular students in a veterinary school or college from
performing duties or actions assigned by the school or college or working
under the direct personal supervision of a veterinarian licensed in the State
of Arkansas;
(3) Reciprocal aid of neighbors in performing routine accepted
livestock management practices without compensation;
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(4) Any veterinarian licensed in any foreign jurisdiction from
consulting with a licensed veterinarian;
(5) The owner of an animal, his or her consignees, and their
employees from performing routine accepted livestock management practices in
the care of animals belonging to the owner;
(6) A member of the faculty of a veterinary school from
performing his or her regular functions or a person from lecturing or giving
instruction or demonstration at a veterinary school or in connection with a
continuing education course or seminar for licensed veterinarians, veterinary
technicians, or veterinary technologists;
(7) A person from engaging in bona fide scientific research that
reasonably requires experimentation involving animals;
(8) Any person:
(A) Engaging in the art or profession of horseshoeing;
(B) Training, except that the training shall not include
diagnosing, prescribing, or dispensing of any therapeutic agent;
(C) Selling medicines, feed, appliances, or other products
used in the prevention or treatment of animal diseases as permitted by law,
by any pharmacist, merchant, or manufacturer at his or her regular place of
business;
(D) Collecting, preparing, or freezing semen; and
(E) Performing nonsurgical artificial insemination;
(9)(A) Any act, task, or function performed by a veterinary
technician or veterinary technologist at the direction of and under the
supervision of a licensed veterinarian, when:
(i) The veterinary technician or veterinary
technologist is certified by the commission board as being qualified by
training or experience to function as an assistant to a veterinarian;
(ii) The act, task, or function is performed at the
direction of and under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian in
accordance with rules promulgated by the commission board; and
(iii) The services of the veterinary technician or
veterinary technologist are limited to assisting the veterinarian in the
particular fields for which he or she has been trained and certified.
(B) Subdivision (b)(9)(A) of this section shall not limit
or prevent any veterinarian from delegating to a qualified person any acts,
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
tasks, or functions which are otherwise permitted by law but which do not
include diagnosis, prescribing medication, or surgery;
(10) A chiropractor licensed in this state and certified by the
American Veterinary Chiropractic Association or the equivalent thereof from
performing chiropractic upon animals;
(11) The practice of veterinary medicine through a program in
partnership with federal Innovative Readiness Training if the veterinarian or
veterinary technician has obtained a license to practice from another state,
commonwealth, territory, or the District of Columbia;
(12) A person from practicing or performing equine massage
therapy or animal massage therapy; or
(13) An emergency medical services personnel or an emergency
medical services provider from transporting an injured police dog as
authorized under § 20-13-217.

17-101-308. Veterinary technicians — Denial, suspension, or revocation
of certificate.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health may deny or suspend any registration or deny or revoke any certificate
of qualification upon the grounds that the applicant or veterinary technician
is guilty of:
(1) Soliciting patients for any practitioner of the veterinary
healing arts;
(2) Soliciting or receiving any form of compensation from any
person other than his or her registered employer for performing as a
veterinary technician;
(3) Willfully or negligently divulging a professional secret or
discussing a veterinarian's diagnosis or treatment without the express
permission of the veterinarian;
(4)(A) Any offense punishable by incarceration in the Division
of Correction or federal prison.
(B) A copy of the record of conviction, certified by the
clerk of the court entering the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence;
(5) Being unable to practice as a veterinary technician with
reasonable skill and safety to patients because of illness, the use of drugs,
alcohol, narcotics, or chemicals, or as a result of any mental or physical
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
condition;
(6) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring:
(A) A certificate of qualification to perform as a
veterinary technician in Arkansas; or
(B) An annual registration;
(7) Impersonating another person registered as a veterinary
technician or allowing any person to use his or her certificate of
qualification or registration;
(8) Aiding or abetting the practice of veterinary medicine by a
person not licensed by the commission board;
(9) Gross negligence in the performance of duties, tasks, or
functions assigned to him or her by a licensed veterinarian;
(10) Manifesting incapacity or incompetence to perform as a
veterinary technician; or
(11) Conduct unbecoming a person registered as a veterinary
technician or detrimental to the best interests of the public.
(b) At the discretion of the commission board, any person whose
certificate of qualification is suspended or revoked by the commission board
under this section may be recertified or reinstated by the commission board
at any time upon written application to the commission board showing cause to
justify recertification or reinstatement.

17-101-309. License, certificate, and registration renewal —
Reinstatement.
(a)(1) All licenses, certificates, and registrations expire on March
31 each year and may be renewed by payment of the annual renewal fee
established by rule of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health.
(2) Not later than March 1 each year, the commission Department
of Agriculture shall provide a written notice to each licensed veterinarian,
veterinary technician, and veterinary technologist that his or her license or
certificate will expire on March 31 and shall provide a renewal application
form.
(b)(1) Any person may reinstate an expired license or certificate
within five (5) years of its expiration by making application to the
commission department for renewal and paying the current renewal fee along
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
with all delinquent renewal fees.
(2) After five (5) years have elapsed since the date of
expiration, a license or certificate may not be renewed, and the holder must
apply for a new license or certificate and take the required examinations.
(c) The commission board may provide by rule for waiver of payment of
any renewal fee of a licensed veterinarian, veterinary technician, or
veterinary technologist during any period when he or she is on active duty
with any branch of the United States Armed Forces for not to exceed three (3)
years or for the duration of a national emergency, whichever is longer.
(d) The commission board may provide by rule for waiver of payment of
any renewal fee of a licensed veterinarian or veterinary technician during
any period when he or she is a member of the Arkansas National Guard called
into state active duty.

17-101-310. Continuing education required — Exemptions.
(a)(1) A veterinarian, veterinary technician, or veterinary
technologist under this chapter is required to attend an educational program
in the twelve (12) months preceding each renewal date.
(2) The postgraduate study or attendance at an institution or at
an educational session approved by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health shall be considered equivalent to
continuing education requirements.
(3) The commission board shall have the right, for good cause
shown, to prescribe the type and character of postgraduate study to be done
by any licensed veterinarian in order to comply with the requirements of this
chapter.
(b) The commission board shall excuse licentiates or certificate
holders, as a group or as individuals, from the annual educational
requirements in any of the following instances:
(1) When no educational program meeting the requirements
approved by the commission board is conducted within the state;
(2) When an affidavit is submitted to the commission board
evidencing that the licensee, for good cause assigned, was prevented from
attending an educational program at the proper time;
(3) In the event of an unusual emergency; or
(4) If that person holds an inactive license or certificate.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(c)(1) A veterinarian, veterinary technician, or veterinary
technologist shall fulfill his or her annual education requirements at his or
her own expense.
(2) The fee for his or her annual education requirements is not
included in the license fee.
(d)(1) A veterinary technician specialist shall complete an additional
eight (8) hours of advanced continuing education in his or her area of
specialty each year before veterinary technician specialist certification
renewal.
(2) A veterinary technician specialist shall maintain an active
veterinary technician certification in this state and fulfill all continuing
education hours required for the veterinary technician certification.

17-101-311. Civil penalty — Appeals and disposition of funds.
(a)(1) Whenever the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health determines that any provision of this chapter or any rule
promulgated by the commission board under this chapter has been violated, the
commission board may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per violation.
(2) The commission board may file an action in the Pulaski
County Circuit Court to collect any civil penalty not paid within thirty (30)
days of service of the order assessing the penalty, unless the circuit court
enters a stay of the commission's board's order.
(3) If the commission board prevails in the action, the
defendant shall be directed to pay reasonable attorney's fees and costs
incurred by the commission board in prosecuting the action in addition to the
civil penalty.
(b) Any person aggrieved by the action of the commission board
imposing civil penalties may appeal the decision in the manner and under the
procedure prescribed in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-
201 et seq., for appeals from administrative decisions.
(c)(1) All funds derived from civil penalties imposed by the
commission board shall be deposited into one (1) or more depositories
qualifying for the deposit of public funds.
(2) The funds shall be used by the commission board for
administering the provisions of this chapter.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

17-101-312. Unlawful practice — Penalties — Injunctions.
(a) Any person who shall practice or attempt to practice veterinary
medicine in this state without having been duly licensed in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon
conviction, the person shall be fined in any sum of not less than fifty
dollars ($50.00) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each and
every offense or imprisoned for a term of not less than six (6) months nor
more than one (1) year, or shall be both fined and imprisoned in the
discretion of the court.
(b) Each day of the unlawful practice shall constitute a separate
offense.
(c) One-half (½) of the sums assessed as fines under this chapter
shall be paid into the general fund of the county wherein the fine is
assessed, and one-half (½) of the sums assessed as fines under this chapter
shall be deposited with the Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission and credited to the account of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission into the Animal Health Special Revenue Fund.
(d) The unlawful practice of veterinary medicine is declared to be a
public nuisance.
(e) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, the
commission Arkansas Board of Animal Health may institute legal proceedings to
enjoin the violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules of the
commission board in any court of competent jurisdiction, and the court may
grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining the violation thereof.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code §§ 17-101-314 through 17-101-320, as amended
by Acts 2025, No. 19, are amended to read as follows:
17-101-314. Practicing without license — Commission penalties
Penalties.
(a)(1)(A) If upon completion review of an investigation a complaint
the Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health has probable cause to believe that a veterinarian or an unlicensed
person acting as a veterinarian has violated the provisions of this chapter,
he or she may issue a citation to the veterinarian or unlicensed person, as
provided in this section.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(B) Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe
with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the
provision of this chapter alleged to have been violated.
(C) Each citation may also contain an order of abatement
fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation and may contain an
assessment of a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(2) The citation shall be served upon the veterinarian or
unlicensed individual personally or by any type of mailing requiring a return
receipt.
(b)(1) If a veterinarian or unlicensed person desires to
administratively contest a civil citation or the proposed assessment of a
civil penalty, he or she shall notify within ten (10) business days after
service of the citation the executive officer in writing of his or her
request.
(2) Upon receipt of the request, a hearing on the matter shall
be scheduled before the commission board.
(c) Any administrative hearing shall be governed by the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(d) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, the
commission board may institute legal proceedings to enjoin the violation of
the provisions of this chapter or the rules of the commission board in any
court of competent jurisdiction, and the court may grant a temporary or
permanent injunction restraining the violation thereof.

17-101-315. Equine teeth floating.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health is prohibited from enforcing commission may enforce board policy
regarding equine teeth floating by either investigating or prosecuting an
individual practitioner engaged in equine teeth floating until July 1, 2013.
(b)(1) Before engaging in the practice of equine teeth floating in the
state, an individual practitioner shall present to the commission board
signed letters of recommendation from two (2) clients who have previously
employed the individual practitioner and who bear witness to the individual
practitioner's ability to perform equine teeth floating.
(2) The letters of recommendation shall be presented to the
commission board before providing service to a client or performing any
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
procedure on any animal.

17-101-316. Livestock embryo transfer or transplant and livestock
pregnancy determination.
(a) Until July 1, 2019, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
is prohibited from investigating or prosecuting The Arkansas Board of Animal
Health under a commission board rule or policy may investigate an individual
technician who engages in both:
(1) Livestock embryo transfer or transplant; and
(2) Livestock pregnancy determination.
(b) Before engaging in livestock embryo transfer or transplant and
livestock pregnancy determination in the state, an individual technician
shall obtain a certification from the commission board.
(c)(1) An applicant for certification shall submit the following
information to the commission Department of Agriculture with an application
and application fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000):
(A)(i) One (1) letter from a licensed veterinarian who has
witnessed the applicant's ability to perform livestock embryo transfer or
transplant and livestock pregnancy determination on at least three (3)
occasions within six (6) consecutive months.
(ii) The letter described in subdivision
(c)(1)(A)(i) of this section shall include the dates that the veterinarian
spent with the applicant and an endorsement certifying that the applicant is
proficient in the following areas:
(a) Basic knowledge, skills, and abilities
required to proficiently extract, grade, freeze, thaw, and transfer livestock
embryos; and
(b) The ability to properly use ultrasound
equipment in determining pregnancy status with at least ninety percent (90%)
accuracy beginning at sixty (60) days of pregnancy and with at least ninety
percent (90%) accuracy when identifying trimester;
(B) A record of successfully completing a qualified course
taught by a livestock reproduction specialist on both livestock embryo
transfer and livestock pregnancy determination;
(C) Proof that the applicant has at least fifty percent
(50%) financial interest in livestock management equipment, including without
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
limitation ultrasound equipment, microscope, embryo freezer, and other
required transfer tools; and
(D) Proof of membership in either the International Embryo
Technology Society or the American Embryo Transfer Association.
(2) The commission department shall approve or deny
certification within thirty (30) days of receiving an application.
(d)(1) A certification under this section expires after two (2) years.
(2) An individual technician shall submit a renewal application
and renewal application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the
commission board along with a record of completion of a continuing education
course on bovine reproduction within the United States or Canada.
(3) The commission department shall approve or deny
recertification within thirty (30) days of receiving a renewal application.
(e) An embryo transfer technician may only administer to livestock
prescription drugs that have been prescribed by a licensed veterinarian who
has a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship.

17-101-317. Veterinary technologist and veterinary technician
specialist — Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation.
(a) Upon written complaint by any person or on the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission's Board of Animal Health's own motion and after notice
and hearing as prescribed in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq., the commission board may deny or suspend any certification or
deny or revoke any certificate of qualification of the applicant, veterinary
technologist, or veterinary technician specialist for the following conduct:
(1) Solicitation of patients on behalf of a veterinarian or
veterinary technician;
(2) Solicitation or receiving any form of compensation from any
person other than his or her registered employer for his or her employment;
(3) Willful or negligent disclosure of a professional secret or
discussing a veterinarian's diagnosis or treatment without the express
permission of the veterinarian;
(4)(A) Any offense punishable by incarceration in the Division
of Correction or federal prison.
(B) A copy of the record of conviction, certified by the
clerk of the court entering the conviction, shall be evidence;
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(5) Inability to practice as a veterinary technologist or a
veterinary technician specialist with reasonable skill and safety to patients
due to illness, the use of drugs, alcohol, narcotics, or chemicals, or as a
result of any mental or physical condition;
(6) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring:
(A) A certificate of qualification to perform as a
veterinary technologist or veterinary technician specialist in Arkansas; or
(B) An annual employment registration;
(7) Impersonation of another person registered as a veterinary
technologist or veterinary technician specialist or authorization of any
person to use his or her certificate of qualification or registration;
(8) Aids or abets the practice of veterinary medicine by a
person not licensed by the commission board;
(9) Incompetence, gross negligence, or other malpractice in the
performance of duties, tasks, or functions assigned to him or her by a
licensed veterinarian;
(10) Incapacity or incompetence to perform as a veterinary
technologist or veterinary technician specialist;
(11) Cruelty to animals;
(12) Failure:
(A) Of any applicant or licensee to cooperate with the
commission Department of Agriculture during any investigation, if the
investigation does not concern the applicant or licensee;
(B) To comply with any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum
from the commission board or an order of the commission board; or
(C) To timely pay certification or renewal fees; or
(13) Unprofessional conduct or conduct that is detrimental to
the best interests of the public.
(b) At the discretion of the commission board, a person whose
certificate of qualification is suspended or revoked by the commission board
under this section may be:
(1) Recertified or reinstated by the commission board at any
time upon written application to the commission board showing cause to
justify recertification or reinstatement; and
(2) Subject to civil penalties under § 17-101-311 as determined
by the commission board.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

17-101-318. Veterinarians — Restricted license.
(a) The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health or his or her designee may issue a restricted license
to a person who has graduated from an accredited or approved college of
veterinary medicine but has not passed the North American Veterinary
Licensing Examination, or its future equivalent, to engage in the practice of
veterinary medicine under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian.
(b) A restricted license shall be issued by the commission board upon
the receipt of the following:
(1) A completed application as described in § 17-101-301 and the
application fee established by the commission board, if not previously
submitted during the applicant's final year of veterinary school;
(2) A restricted license fee established by the commission
board;
(3) A letter of recommendation from the supervising licensed
veterinarian; and
(4) Written confirmation that the applicant is scheduled to take
the next available North American Veterinary Licensing Examination, or its
future equivalent.
(c) If the applicant fails to pass the North American Veterinary
Licensing Examination, or its future equivalent, after receiving a restricted
license, the applicant may be issued another restricted license by submitting
the following:
(1) The restricted license fee established by the commission
board;
(2) A letter of recommendation from the supervising licensed
veterinarian; and
(3) Written confirmation that the applicant is scheduled to take
the next available North American Veterinary Licensing Examination, or its
future equivalent.
(d)(1) A restricted license shall expire the day after the results of
the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination, or its future
equivalent, are made known to the applicant.
(2) An applicant shall not be issued more than three (3)
restricted licenses.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(e) The applicant is eligible for an unrestricted license to practice
veterinary medicine upon receiving a passing score on the North American
Veterinary Licensing Examination, or its future equivalent, if all other
requirements are met for the unrestricted license.
(f) A restricted licensee shall not apply:
(1) For a United States Drug Enforcement Administration
registration; or
(2) To become an accredited veterinarian through the United
States Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service.

17-101-319. Veterinary technician specialist — Certification.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall issue additional certifications for a veterinary technician
specialist.
(2) For an applicant seeking certification as a veterinary
technician specialist, the commission board may require:
(A) An initial application and an initial application fee
as determined by the commission board;
(B) A renewal application and a renewal application fee as
determined by the commision board; and
(C) Any other relevant information determined by the
commission board.
(b)(1) A veterinary technician specialist shall perform specialized
veterinary technology under the direction, supervision, and responsibility of
the:
(A) Licensed veterinarian with whom he or she is employed;
or
(B) Collaborating veterinarian under a collaborative
practice agreement.
(2) Supervision of a veterinary technician specialist may be
direct supervision, indirect supervision, or immediate supervision.
(3)(A) A veterinarian who utilizes indirect supervision of a
veterinary technician specialist shall:
(i) Retain control of and authority over the care of
the animal patient; and
(ii) Review all record keeping and notes documented
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
by the veterinary technician specialist on the charts regarding the care of
the animal patient.
(B) When utilizing indirect supervision, a supervising
veterinarian may authorize a veterinary technician specialist to go to a
location other than the location of the supervising veterinarian to provide
services based on an emergency call for an animal patient.
(c)(1) A licensed veterinarian using, supervising, or employing a
veterinary technician specialist is individually responsible and liable for
the performance of the acts and omissions delegated to the veterinary
technician specialist.
(2) This subsection does not relieve a veterinary technician
specialist of any responsibility or liability for any of his or her own acts
and omissions.
(3) A licensed veterinarian shall not establish a separate
office or clinic in a location other than his or her regular office and place
the separate office or clinic under the control or supervision of a
veterinary technician specialist.
(d) A veterinary technician specialist shall not receive compensation
for performing the practice of specialized veterinary technology other than
the salary or compensation paid to the veterinary technician specialist by
the veterinary clinic, veterinary practice, or veterinarian by which he or
she is employed.
(e) A person shall not use or assume the title “certified veterinary
technician specialist”, “veterinary technician specialist”, “VTS”, or “CVTS”
or use any words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying
that the person holds a veterinary technician specialist certification unless
the person is certified by the commission board.

17-101-320. Collaborative practice agreement.
(a)(1)(A) A veterinary technician specialist and a veterinarian may
enter into a collaborative practice agreement.
(B) A veterinarian shall not enter into a collaborative
practice agreement with more than three (3) veterinary technician specialists
at one (1) time.
(2) A collaborative practice agreement shall include without
limitation provisions addressing:
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(A) The location and license details of both the
veterinary technician specialist and collaborating veterinarian as well as
the availability of the collaborating veterinarian for consultation or
referral, or both;
(B) Methods of management of the collaborative practice,
which shall include protocols for technical duties;
(C) Coverage of the veterinary needs of an animal patient
in the emergency absence of the veterinary technician specialist or
collaborating veterinarian; and
(D) Quality assurance with monthly reviews of the
veterinary technician specialist's animal patients' medical records or case
discussions with the collaborating veterinarian.
(3) If a collaborative practice results in complaints of
violations of this chapter, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health may review the role of the collaborating veterinarian
or the veterinary technician specialist in the collaborative practice to
determine if the collaborating veterinarian or the veterinary technician
specialist is unable to manage his or her responsibilities under the
collaborative practice agreement without an adverse effect on the quality of
care of the animal patient.
(4) A veterinary technician specialist shall notify the
commission Department of Agriculture in writing within seven (7) days
following the termination of a collaborative practice agreement.
(b)(1) A veterinary technician specialist may receive drugs,
medicines, or therapeutic devices appropriate to the veterinary technician
specialist's area of practice.
(2) If the collaborative practice agreement between a veterinary
technician specialist and a collaborating veterinarian is terminated, a new
collaborative practice agreement shall be required.
(3) Under the supervision of a collaborating veterinarian, a
veterinary technician specialist may:
(A)(i) Establish care for new animal patients by forming a
preliminary veterinarian-client-patient relationship on behalf of the
collaborating veterinarian with the animal patient or client, order
diagnostics, provide a diagnosis or a prognosis, and develop treatment plans
with a collaborating veterinarian.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(ii) The collaborating veterinarian shall complete
the veterinarian-client-patient relationship by personally seeing the animal
patient within fifteen (15) days;
(B) Perform the induction, maintenance, and monitoring of
anesthesia for an animal patient except when in conflict with state or
federal law;
(C) Perform minor dental and surgical procedures on animal
patients, excluding abdominal, thoracic, or orthopedic surgery and
neurosurgery;
(D) Administer a drug or controlled substance to prevent
suffering of animal patients, including without limitation euthanasia, under
direct communication with a collaborating veterinarian;
(E) Initiate and perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation on
animal patients, including administration of medication and defibrillation,
and provide immediate post-resuscitation care according to established
protocols except when in conflict with state or federal law; and
(F) Dispense and administer medicines or therapeutic
devices for animal patients except when in conflict with state or federal
law.
(c) The veterinary technician specialist shall keep accurate records
in accordance with the rules of the commission Arkansas Board of Animal
Health, including without limitation the medical history, physical
examination, other evaluations and consultations, treatment plan objective,
informed consent noted in the animal patient's record, treatment,
prescriptions, and medications given, agreements regarding the animal
patient, and periodic reviews.

SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 18-15-1703(e)(2), concerning exemptions
from application of the Private Property Protection Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) Laws or rules within the jurisdiction of the State Health
Officer or regulatory activities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and
Ecology Commission, the Division of Environmental Quality, the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health, the Arkansas Public
Service Commission, or the State Plant Board under delegated or authorized
programs or approved plans under federal law;
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(022), concerning motor vehicle
restrictions and authorizations related to state agencies, authorities,
boards, commissions, departments, and institutions of higher education, is
amended to read as follows:
(022) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health 81

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 19-5-302(8), concerning the Livestock and
Poultry Fund Account, is amended to read as follows:
(8) Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Fund Account.
(A) The Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Fund Account
shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission, which was separated from the Department of
Commerce [abolished] by Acts 1981, No. 867, § 1, in carrying out the
functions, powers, and duties as set out in § 2-33-101 et seq., or other
duties imposed by law upon the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health.
(B) The Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Fund Account
shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law; and
(ii) Any other funds provided by law;

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(33) and (34), concerning the
enumeration of special revenues, are amended to read as follows:
(33) Brand registration, sales of state brand books, and fees for
transfer of brand titles, as enacted by Acts 1959, No. 179, § 2-34-201, § 2-
34-202 [repealed], § 2-34-203, § 2-34-204 [repealed], and §§ 2-34-205 2-34-206
— 2-34-212;
(34) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health
fees and revenues as enacted by Acts 1981, No. 867, and all laws amendatory
thereto, § 2-33-113(a), consisting of:
(A) Income from the livestock spraying program, as enacted
by Acts 1969, No. 360, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 2-33-207 [repealed]
and § 2-33-208 [repealed];
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(B) Poultry and egg grading fees as enacted by Acts 1969,
No. 220, known as the “Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969”, and all laws
amendatory thereto, § 20-58-201 et seq.;
(C) Acts 1965, No. 49, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§
2-33-301 2-33-303 — 2-33-305, and 2-33-307;
(D) Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1216, and all
laws amendatory thereto, §§ 2-33-306 and 2-33-307;
(E) Carcass data information and feeder pig and feeder
calf grading fees, as enacted by Acts 1973, No. 454, and all laws amendatory
thereto, §§ 2-33-201 — 2-33-206 [repealed];
(F) Livestock and poultry diagnostic service fees, § 2-33-
111;
(G) State, county, and district paid admission surcharges,
§ 2-33-115(a)(3) [repealed];
(H) Small animal testing fees, as enacted by Acts 1981,
No. 770, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 2-33-112 [repealed];
(I) Commercial bait and ornamental fish fees collected
under the Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Act, § 2-5-201 et seq.; and
(J) Catfish processor civil penalties collected under the
Arkansas Catfish Processor Fair Practices Act of 1987, § 2-6-101 et seq.;

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(95), concerning the enumeration
of special revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(95) Fees charged by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health for the various examinations, permits,
licenses, and certificates issued by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Department of Agriculture, as enacted by Acts 1975, No. 650, as
amended, the Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice Act, § 17-101-101 et seq.;

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(126), concerning the enumeration
of special revenues, is repealed.
(126) Those portions of vaccination fees imposed at livestock
markets, as enacted by Acts 1985, No. 150, and Acts 1985, No. 151, § 2-40-
206, and that portion of all fines and penalties resulting from arrests made
or citations issued by Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission enforcement
officers, § 2-33-113(b) [repealed];
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code § 19-6-409 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-409. Poultry and Egg Grading Fund.
The Poultry and Egg Grading Fund shall consist of that portion of those
special revenues derived from the poultry and egg industry as specified in §
19-6-301(34), there to be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission poultry
and egg grading programs, in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties
as set out in § 2-33-101 et seq., or other duties imposed by law upon the
commission Department of Agriculture.

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 19-6-429 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-429. Veterinary Examiners Board Fund.
(a) The Veterinary Examiners Board Fund shall consist of those special
revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(95).
(b) The fund shall be used:
(1) For the operation, maintenance, and improvement of the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health in
exercising the powers, functions, and duties as set out in the Arkansas
Veterinary Medical Practice Act, § 17-101-101 et seq.; and
(2) To fund:
(A) The Agri Scholarship Program created under § 25-38-212
and administered by the Department of Agriculture, with deposits to the Agri
Scholarship Program Fund in the amount of up to thirty thousand dollars
($30,000) per year; and
(B) The Rural Veterinary Student Scholarship Program, §
17-101-205.

SECTION 69. Arkansas Code § 19-6-433 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-433. Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Equine Infectious Anemia
Control Fund.
The Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Equine Infectious Anemia
Control Fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in § 19-6-
301(195), there to be used for the purpose of defraying the costs of services
performed in the Equine Infectious Anemia Control and Eradication Program as
set out in § 2-40-801 et seq.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550

SECTION 70. Arkansas Code § 19-6-448 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-448. Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health Disease and
Pest Control Fund.
The Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health Disease and Pest
Control Fund shall consist of any funds authorized by law and those special
revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(126), there to be used in order to fund
or partially fund the bovine disease control and eradication program as
provided in § 2-40-206.

SECTION 71. Arkansas Code § 19-6-466 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-466. Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health Swine Testing
Fund.
The Livestock and Poultry Commission Animal Health Swine Testing Fund
shall consist of those special revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(159),
there to be used for the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Program as set
out in § 2-40-1201.

SECTION 72. Arkansas Code § 19-6-480 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-480. Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Special Revenue Fund.
(a) The Livestock and Poultry Animal Health Special Revenue Fund shall
consist of those special revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(33) and (34) and
§§ 2-5-204, 2-5-206, and 2-6-106 that are not required for support of the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Department of Agriculture Poultry
and Egg Grading Program, there to be used for those purposes as set out by
law.
(b) The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health, with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, shall have the authority to transfer funds from the Livestock and
Poultry Animal Health Special Revenue Fund to the Livestock and Poultry
Animal Health Fund Account.

SECTION 73. Arkansas Code § 20-19-312 is amended to read as follows:
20-19-312. State Board of Health's authority to regulate.
(a) The State Board of Health shall adopt rules necessary to carry out
this subchapter, with subsequent amendments as needed.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(b) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health may adopt rules as are necessary pertaining to dogs and cats
transported or moved into Arkansas for any purpose.

SECTION 74. Arkansas Code § 20-58-204(a), concerning penalties under
the Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions
of this subchapter or rules of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health shall be guilty of a violation and shall upon
conviction:
(1) For the first offense, be fined not less than twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100);
(2) For the second offense, be fined not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250); and
(3) For the third offense, be fined not less than two hundred
fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

SECTION 75. Arkansas Code §§ 20-58-205 and 20-58-206 are amended to
read as follows:
20-58-205. Employees of Department of Agriculture — Powers and duties.
All duties and functions required to be performed by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health under the provisions
of this subchapter shall be performed by the Department of Agriculture or its
authorized employees.

20-58-206. Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health — Establishment of standards.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall establish standards for the grading, classification, and marking
of shell eggs bought and sold by any person, firm, or corporation in the
State of Arkansas.
(b) The standards shall, on the date of the sale to the consumer,
conform to the minimum standards promulgated by the United States Department
of Agriculture as defined in the “United States Standards, Grades and Weight
Classes for Shell Eggs”, authorized under 7 U.S.C. § 1624, effective July 11,
1952, and amendments thereto.
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
(c) The standards of quality of the United States Department of
Agriculture are adopted as the standards of quality for the enforcement of
this subchapter. Any egg described by the United States Department of
Agriculture as being inedible shall be deemed inedible under the provisions
of this subchapter.

SECTION 76. Arkansas Code § 20-58-207(b)(2) and (3), concerning
prohibited acts under the Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969, are amended to
read as follows:
(2) Use descriptive terminology as to eggs that have not been
graded and sized according to the standards set forth by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health; or
(3) Use descriptive terminology such as “fresh” to represent the
same to be “fresh” any eggs excepting those eggs that meet the minimum
requirements of Grade A or higher according to the standards set forth by the
commission board.

SECTION 77. Arkansas Code § 20-58-209(d), concerning egg handler
permits under the Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) No person shall operate a shell egg processing plant and egg
candling room or an egg breaking plant before the plant or room has been
approved by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health or its authorized agent and a permit issued.

SECTION 78. Arkansas Code § 20-58-214 is amended to read as follows:
20-58-214. Enforcement.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health shall enforce the provisions of this subchapter and is authorized to
make and promulgate such rules as may be necessary thereto.
(b)(1)(A) The commission Department of Agriculture and its authorized
employees or agents may enter any store, vehicle, market, or any other
business or place where eggs are bought, stored, sold, offered for sale, or
processed.
(B) The commission department is authorized to make such
inspections as needed of eggs to determine if the grades of the eggs conform
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
to grades as labeled on the exterior of the container.
(2) If the inspection determines that the eggs in the container
do not conform to the grade as labeled on the exterior of the container, the
commission department or its employees or agents are authorized to examine
the invoices and such other records as are needed to determine the cause and
place of the violation of the rule of this subchapter.
(c) The commission department and its authorized employees shall have
the power to stop sale and impound, retain, or destroy any containers of eggs
offered for sale which are in conflict with any provisions of this
subchapter.

SECTION 79. Arkansas Code § 20-58-215(b), concerning the setting of
the inspection and annual permit fees under the Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of
1969, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The inspection fee and annual permit fee will be set by the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health after review
and consultation with the Poultry Federation for all shell eggs and egg
products processed or sold in the State of Arkansas.

SECTION 80. Arkansas Code § 20-58-216 is amended to read as follows:
20-58-216. Audits.
(a) Annual audits of all permit holders, including out-of-state permit
holders, will be performed by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Department of Agriculture to ensure proper reporting of egg inspection fees.
(b)(1) Travel expenses incurred in conducting out-of-state audits are
to be reimbursed to the commission department by out-of-state permit holders.
(2) The State of Arkansas’s out-of-state daily allowance for
meals and lodging will be the maximum amount reimbursable, plus travel
expenses to and from locations of permit holders.

SECTION 81. Arkansas Code § 20-60-206(c)(2), concerning consultation
with meat and meat food products industry under the State Meat Inspection
Program, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Consult with the meat and meat food products industry,
including the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health, as well as the Department of Health, when developing the procedures,
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
rules, and policies regarding the program;

SECTION 82. Arkansas Code § 24-4-804(c)(2), concerning those members
who are exempt from the provisions of the deferred retirement option plan
requiring separation from service, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) This section does not apply to a member who:
(a) Was an employee of the Arkansas Forestry
Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, the Arkansas Board
of Animal Health, or the State Plant Board;
(b) Is a participant in the plan; and
(c) Is an essential seasonal staff member with
the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health, or the State Plant Board.
(ii) This section does not apply to a member who:
(a) Was an employee of the Department of
Agriculture;
(b) Is a participant in the plan; and
(c) Is an essential seasonal staff member with
the department.
(B) As used in subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section,
“essential seasonal staff member” means an employee of the department, the
Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health, or the State Plant Board who:
(i) Has specialized knowledge, skill, or training
pertaining to necessary duties or tasks to be completed by the department,
the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health, or the State Plant Board in times of
emergency, disaster cleanup, extreme weather, or other circumstances deemed
pressing by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health, or the State Plant
Board; and
(ii) Is employed by the department, the Arkansas
Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health, or the State Plant Board on a part-time basis:
(a) During times of emergency, disaster
cleanup, extreme weather, or other circumstances deemed pressing by the
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health, or the State Plant Board; or
(b) As an instructor to train other staff for
times of emergency, disaster cleanup, extreme weather, or other circumstances
deemed pressing by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal Health, or the
State Plant Board.

SECTION 83. Arkansas Code § 25-15-104(a)(1)(K), concerning the
subpoena powers of certain boards and commissions, is amended to read as
follows:
(K) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health, § 2-33-101 et seq.;

SECTION 84. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(27), concerning the stipends
provided to members of certain state boards and commissions, is amended to
read as follows:
(27) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of Animal
Health;

SECTION 85. Arkansas Code § 25-38-202(b)(3)(A)(ii)(d), concerning the
authorization for the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture to delegate
authority regarding rules, orders, or directives promulgated by the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Board of Animal Health;

SECTION 86. Arkansas Code § 25-38-206(a)(2), concerning the transfer
of personnel, administrative functions, human resources, and accounting
offices of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to the Department of
Agriculture, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health;

SECTION 87. Arkansas Code § 25-38-211(a)(5), concerning the transfer
of certain agricultural boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs,
03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130

SB550
and offices to the Department of Agriculture, is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health, created under § 2-33-101;

SECTION 88. Arkansas Code § 25-43-202(a)(6), concerning state entities
transferred to the Department of Agriculture, is amended to read as follows:
(6) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Board of
Animal Health, created under § 2-33-101;

SECTION 89. Arkansas Code § 26-52-518(a)(3)(C)(ii), concerning
exclusions from the definition of "special events" related to returns and
remittance of tax under the gross receipts tax, is amended to read as
follows:
(ii) The four states livestock show that has
been approved under the rules of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission Board of Animal Health to receive state funds; or




















03/20/2025 4:11:24 PM CRH130